Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4210
Cost of evaluation.

The court may order the cost of any evaluation as provided in section 30-4203 to be paid by the county where the guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective proceeding is brought, or the court may, after notice and a hearing, assess the cost of any such evaluation, in whole or in part, to the person who is the subject of the guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective proceeding. The court shall determine the ability of such person to pay and the amount of the payment.

Laws 2016, LB934, § 23.